Hawaii statutes.
§180-9 Renewal of petition to create.
After six months after the date of a determination by the department of land
and natural resources that the operation of a proposed district would not be
administratively practicable and feasible, subsequent petitions covering the
same or substantially the same territory may be filed as aforesaid. [L 1947, c
191, pt of §5; RL 1955, §28-12; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-9]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next